North Dakota, session 69, HB1436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-40.3-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-40.3-02. Tax imposed.
1. There is hereby imposed an excise tax at the rate of five percent on:
a. Five percent on a motor vehicle fewer than eleven years old at the time of
purchase or acquisition.
b. Three percent on a motor vehicle eleven or more years old but fewer than
twenty - six years old at the time of purchase or acquisition .
c. One percent on a motor vehicle more than twenty - five years old at the time o f
purchase or acquisition.
2. The excise tax is assessed on the purchase price of any motor vehicle purchased or
acquired either in or outside of thethis state of North Dakota for use on the streets and
highways of this state and required to be registered under the laws of this state.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after
June 30, 2025.
Page No. 1 25.0838.01000